Hawaii statutes.
§89-8.5 Negotiating authority; Hawaii
health systems corporation. [See Note below.] Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, including section
89-6(d), the Hawaii health systems corporation or any of the regional boards,
as a sole employer negotiator, may negotiate with the exclusive representative
of any appropriate bargaining unit and execute memorandums of understanding for
employees under its control to alter any existing or new collective bargaining
agreement on any item or items subject to section 89-9; provided that an
alteration that intrudes beyond the jurisdiction of the Hawaii health systems
corporation shall be effective only if the employer of the governmental
jurisdiction intruded upon consents to the alteration in writing. [L
2009, c 182, §5; am L 2015, c 103, §3]

Note

Repeal and reenactment of §89-8.5 one year after the transfer
completion date specified in an agreement negotiated and entered into under
chapter 323F, part IV. L 2015, c 103, §7.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next